Hawaii, session 2026, HB1282.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 321-11.2, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows: "(a)  The department of health is authorized to certify adult foster homes for individuals with developmental or intellectual disabilities requiring care beyond the individual's eighteenth birthday.  "Adult foster home" means a private family home providing care on a twenty-four hour basis to adults with developmental or intellectual disabilities. To be certified, an adult foster home shall house not more than two adults with developmental or intellectual disabilities who are unrelated to the certified caregiver at the same time. The director of health may waive the two-adult limit for certification of that home as an adult foster home; provided that the total number of adults with developmental or intellectual disabilities in the home shall not exceed three adults with developmental or intellectual disabilities who are related or unrelated to the certified caregiver. For the purposes of this subsection: "Certified caregiver" means an individual who is [twenty-one] eighteen years of age or older, resides in an adult foster home, and has been issued by the department a valid certificate of approval to provide care, training, and supervision on a twenty-four hour basis to adults with developmental or intellectual disabilities. "Related" means connected by legal guardianship, trusteeship, blood, marriage, or a legal relationship between the certified caregiver and the adult with developmental or intellectual disabilities." SECTION 2.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________